New York, session 2025-2026, A689.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 511 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 607 of the laws of 1993, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (b) Aggravated unlicensed operation of a motor vehicle in the third 5 degree is a [misdemeanor] violation. When a person is convicted of this 6 offense, the sentence of the court must be: (i) a fine of not less than 7 two hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars; or (ii) a term 8 of imprisonment of not more than [thirty] fifteen days; or (iii) both 9 such fine and imprisonment. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02041-01-5